Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1850.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended by adding an article to read:ARTICLE XVII-B.1TEACHER TAX CREDITSection 1701-B.1. Scope of article.This article relates to teacher tax credits.Section 1702-B.1. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article 123456789101112131415161718192021 shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Certified teacher." A teacher who, during any portion of the taxable year for which the tax credit is being sought, was certified as a teacher by the Commonwealth and was employed as a teacher in a public, nonpublic or charter school."Classroom expenses and supplies." The term includes books, supplies, computers and related equipment, including related software and services, other equipment and supplementary materials."Department." The Department of Revenue of the Commonwealth."Tax credit." The teacher tax credit established under this article."Taxpayer." An individual subject to tax under Article III.Section 1703-B.1. Tax credit for teachers.A taxpayer who is a certified teacher and incurs business expenses for the purchase of classroom expenses and supplies in a taxable year may apply for a tax credit. Section 1704-B.1. Eligibility.(a) Determination of eligibility.--In order to determine eligibility for the tax credit, the Department of Education shall annually provide to the department a list of all individuals who were certified teachers during the taxable year.(b) Ineligibility.--(1) A taxpayer shall be ineligible for the tax credit unless the department verifies that the taxpayer's name appears on the list provided by the Department of Education for the taxable year in which the tax credit is being sought. (2) A taxpayer shall be ineligible for the tax credit if the taxpayer has claimed a deduction for unreimbursed 20250HB1850PN2286 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 business expenses related to classroom education under Article III for the taxable year in which the tax credit is sought. This paragraph shall not apply if any part of the amount of unreimbursed business expenses claimed is unrelated to classroom expenses and supplies.Section 1705-B.1. Carryover, carryback, sale, and assignment of tax credit.A taxpayer is not entitled to carry forward, carry back, sell or assign all or a portion of a tax credit granted to the taxpayer under this article.Section 1706-B.1. Amount of credit.The amount of the tax credit shall be equal to 50% of the amount of the Federal tax deduction claimed by the taxpayer under 26 U.S.C. § 62(a)(2)(D) (relating to adjusted gross income defined).Section 1707-B.1 . Application. A taxpayer may apply for a tax credit under this article in a manner prescribed by the department.Section 1708-B.1 . Administration. The department shall promulgate rules and regulations to administer the provisions of this article.Section 2. This act shall apply to taxable years commencing after December 31, 2026.Section 3. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB1850PN2286 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324